Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,147.03
Hazardous materials endorsement; application process.

Beginning on an implementation date designated by the director, an applicant for a new, renewal, or transferred hazardous materials endorsement shall complete an application process including threat assessment, background check, fingerprints, and payment of fees as prescribed by 49 C.F.R. 1522, 1570, and 1572. Upon receipt of a determination of threat assessment from the Transportation Security Administration of the United States Department of Homeland Security or its agent, the department shall retain the application for not less than one year.

Laws 2005, LB 76, § 18.